Utah statutes.
22-3-412.   Receipts normally apportioned -- Timber.
(1)  To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from the sale of
timber and related products pursuant to this section, the trustee shall
allocate the net receipts:
(a)  to income to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land
does not exceed the rate of growth of the timber during the accounting periods
in which a beneficiary has a mandatory income interest;
(b)  to principal to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the
land exceeds the rate of growth of the timber or the net receipts are from the
sale of standing timber;
(c)  to or between income and principal if the net receipts are from the lease
of timberland or from a contract to cut timber from land owned by a trust, by
determining the amount of timber removed from the land under the lease or
contract and applying the rules in Subsections 22-3-411(1)(a) and (b); or
(d)  to principal to the extent that advance payments, bonuses, and other
payments are not allocated pursuant to Subsection 22-3-411(1)(a), (b), or (c).
(2)  In determining net receipts to be allocated pursuant to Subsection
22-3-411(1), a trustee shall deduct and transfer to principal a reasonable
amount for depletion.
(3)  This chapter applies whether or not a decedent or transferor was
harvesting timber from the property before it became subject to the trust.
(4)  If a trust owns an interest in timberland on May 3, 2004, the trustee may
allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided
in this chapter or in the manner used by the trustee before May 3, 2004.  If
the trust acquires an interest in timberland after May 3, 2004, the trustee
shall allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as
provided in this chapter.
